North Dakota, session 69, SB2310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 32-09.1-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
32-09.1-05. Service on office of management and budget - Fees.
Service upon the state of North Dakota, or any state institution, department, or agency, as
garnishee, may be made upon the director of the office of management and budget, or the director's
authorized designee, in the manner provided by law for service in garnishment proceedings, including
the fee to be tendered and paid the office of management and budget for making and filing an affidavit
of disclosure in the amount of twenty-five dollarsforty dollars. The fee must be deposited in the state
treasury. The director of the office of management and budget may provide for an optional electronic
method of service for which disclosure fees are not required.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 32-09.1-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
32-09.1-10. Disclosure fees.
In all garnishment proceedings, the plaintiff, when the garnishee summons is served upon the
garnishee, shall tender to the garnishee the sum of twenty-five dollarsforty dollars as the fee for making
an affidavit of disclosure.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 32-09.1-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
32-09.1-16. Minimum judgment.
NoA judgment may not be rendered against a garnishee if the judgment against the defendant is
less than twenty-five dollarsforty dollars, exclusive of costs, rather, the garnishee shall be discharged.

S. B. NO. 2310 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2310.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 78 Nays 12 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State